Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0015.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 2. As used in this act:
(a) "Department" means the department of licensing labor and
regulatory affairs.economic opportunity.
(b) "Director" means the director of the department of
licensing and regulatory affairs or his or her the director's
designee.
(c) "Domestic partner" means an adult in a committed
relationship with another adult, including both same-sex and
GSS S01066'25 (S-1) p1foi7


different-sex relationships. "Committed relationship" As used in
this subdivision, "committed relationship" means one a relationship
in which the employee and another individual share responsibility
for a significant measure of each other's common welfare, such as
any relationship between individuals of the same or different sex
that is granted legal recognition by a state, political
subdivision, or the District of Columbia as a marriage or analogous
relationship, including, but not limited to, a civil union.
(d) "Domestic violence" has the same meaning means that term
as provided defined in section 1 of 1978 PA 389, MCL 400.1501.
(e) "Earned sick time" means time off from work that is
provided by an employer to an employee, whether paid or unpaid,
that can be used for the purposes described in subsection (1) of
section 4 of this act.section 4(1).
(f) "Employee" means an individual engaged in service to an
employer in the business of the employer, except that employee does
not include an individual employed by the United States government.
(g) "Employer" means any person, firm, business, educational
institution, nonprofit agency, corporation, limited liability
company, government entity, or other entity that employs 1 or more
individuals, except that employer does not include the United
States government.
(h) "Family member" includes all of the following:
(i) (i) A biological, adopted or foster child, stepchild or
legal ward, a child of a domestic partner, or a child to whom the
employee stands in loco parentis.
(ii) (ii) A biological parent, foster parent, stepparent, or
adoptive parent or a legal guardian of an employee or an employee's
spouse or domestic partner or a person an individual who stood in
GSS S01066'25 (S-1) p1foi7


loco parentis when the employee was a minor child.
(iii) (iii) A person An individual to whom the employee is
legally married under the laws of any state or a domestic partner.
(iv) (iv) A grandparent.
(v) (v) A grandchild.
(vi) (vi) A biological, foster, or adopted sibling.
(vii) (vii) Any other An individual related by blood or
affinity to the employee.
(viii) An individual whose close association with the employee
is the equivalent of a family relationship.
(i) "Health care professional" means any of the following:
(i) (i) Any person licensed under federal law or the law of
this state to provide health care services, including, but not
limited to, nurses, doctors, and emergency room personnel.
(ii) (ii) A certified midwife.
(j) "Retaliatory personnel action" means any of the following:
(i) (i) Denial of any right guaranteed under this act.
(ii) (ii) A threat, discharge, suspension, demotion, reduction
of hours, or other adverse action against an employee or former
employee for exercise of a right guaranteed under this act.
(iii) (iii) Sanctions against an employee who is a recipient of
public benefits for exercise of a right guaranteed under this act.
(iv) (iv) Interference with, or punishment for, an individual's
participation in any manner in an investigation, proceeding, or
hearing under this act.
(k) "Sexual assault" means any act that constitutes a
violation of violates section 520b, 520c, 520d, 520e, 520f, or 520g
of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.520b, 750.520c,
750.520d, 750.520e, 750.520f, and 750.520g.
GSS S01066'25 (S-1) p1foi7


(l) (l) "Small business" means an employer for which fewer than
10 25 individuals work for compensation during a given week. In
determining the number of individuals performing work for
compensation during a given week, all individuals performing work
for compensation on a full-time, part-time, or temporary basis
shall must be counted, including individuals made available to work
through the services of a temporary services or staffing agency or
similar entity. An employer is not a small business if it
maintained 10 25 or more employees on its payroll during any 20 or
more calendar workweeks in either the current or the immediately
preceding calendar year.
Sec. 3. (1) Each An employer shall provide earned sick time to
each of the employer's employees in this state.
(2) (a) Employees Except as otherwise provided in this
subsection, an employee of a small business shall must accrue a
minimum of one 1 hour of earned sick time for every 30 hours worked
but shall may not be entitled to use more than 40 hours of paid
earned sick time in a year unless the employer selects a higher
limit. If an employee of a small business accrues more than 40
hours of earned sick time in a calendar year, the employee shall be
entitled to may use an additional 32 hours of unpaid earned sick
time in that year, unless the employer selects a higher limit.
Employees of a small business must be entitled to may use paid
earned sick time before using unpaid earned sick time. As an
alternative to the accrual of earned sick time, a small business
may provide an employee not less than 40 hours of paid earned sick
time and not less than 32 hours of unpaid earned sick time at the
beginning of a year.
(3) (b) All Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
GSS S01066'25 (S-1) p1foi7


all other employees shall must accrue a minimum of one 1 hour of
paid earned sick time for every 30 hours worked but shall may not
be entitled to use more than 72 hours of paid earned sick time per
in a year, unless the employer selects a higher limit. As an
alternative to the accrual of earned sick time, an employer may
provide an employee not less than 72 hours of paid earned sick time
at the beginning of a year.
(4) (c) Earned Subject to the requirements of this subsection,
earned sick time shall carry carries over from year to year, but a
small business is not required to permit allow an employee to use
more than 40 hours of paid earned sick time and 32 hours of unpaid
earned sick time in a single year, and all other employers are not
required to permit allow an employee to use more than 72 hours of
paid earned sick time in a single year. An employer shall allow an
employee to carry over not more than 144 hours of unused accrued
paid earned sick time from 1 year to another year, unless the
employer does either of the following:
(a) Pays the employee the value of the employee’s unused
accrued paid earned sick time at the end of the year in which the
sick time was earned.
(b) Selects a higher limit of hours of unused accrued paid
earned sick time that may be carried over.
(5) (2) Earned sick time as provided in this section shall
begin begins to accrue on the effective date of this law, act, or
upon commencement of the employee's employment, whichever is later.
An employee may use accrued earned sick time as it is accrued,
except that an employer may require an employee hired after April
1, 2019, the effective date of the 2025 amendatory act that amended
this section to wait until the ninetieth calendar day after
GSS S01066'25 (S-1) p1foi7


commencing employment before using accrued earned sick time, unless
the employee is a qualifying employee as that term is defined in
section 3a. If a year began before the effective date of the
amendatory act that added this sentence and has not ended, earned
sick time provided to an employee under subsection (2) or (3)
before the effective date of the amendatory act that added this
sentence may be counted toward an employer's compliance obligation
under this act.
(3) For purposes of subsection (1), "year" shall mean a
regular and consecutive twelve-month period, as determined by an
employer.
(4) For purposes of earned sick time accrual under this act,
an employee who is exempt from overtime requirements under section
13(a)(1) of the Fair Labor Standards Act, 29 USC 213(a)(1), is
assumed to work 40 hours in each workweek unless the employee's
normal work week is less than 40 hours, in which case earned sick
time accrues based upon that normal workweek.
(6) (5) An employer is in compliance with this section if any
of the following conditions apply:
(a) The employer is an employer other than a small business is
in compliance with this section if the employer and provides any
paid leave time off in at least the same amounts amount as that
provided under this act that may be used for the same purposes and
under the same conditions provided in under this act and that is
accrued at a rate equal to or greater than the rate described in
subsections (1) and (2). subsection (3). An
(b) The employer that is a small business is in compliance
with this section if the employer and provides paid leave time off
in at least the same amounts amount as that provided under this act
GSS S01066'25 (S-1) p1foi7


that may be used for the same purposes and under the same
conditions provided in under this act and that is accrued at a rate
equal to or greater than the rate described in subsections (1) and
subsection (2). provided further that that employees of the small
business are entitled to use paid earned sick time before using
unpaid earned sick time. For purposes of this subsection, "paid
leave" includes but is not limited to paid vacation days, personal
days, and paid time off.
(c) The employer is a member of a multiemployer collective
bargaining agreement and contributes to a multiemployer paid sick
leave plan created in accordance with the Taft-Hartley act of 1947,
29 USC 141 to 191 or a similar multiemployer fringe benefit fund
plan created in accordance with the Taft-Hartley act of 1947, 29
USC 141 to 191, and the employer provides paid time off in at least
the same amount as that provided under this act that may be used
for the same purposes and under the same conditions under this act
and that is accrued at a rate equal to or greater than the rate
described in subsections (2) and (3). If a multiemployer collective
bargaining agreement or other employment agreement meets both of
the following conditions, this subdivision applies to the parties
to the agreement beginning on the date the agreement expires or is
terminated, amended, extended, or renewed:
(i) The agreement is in effect on the effective date of this
act.
(ii) The agreement conflicts with this subdivision.
(7) (6) An employer shall pay each employee using paid earned
sick time at a pay rate equal to the greater of either the normal
hourly wage for that employee or the minimum wage established under
the improved workforce opportunity wage act, 2014 PA 138, MCL
GSS S01066'25 (S-1) p1foi7


408.411 to 408.424, 2018 PA 337, MCL 408.931 to 408.945, but not
less than the minimum wage rate established in section 4 of the
improved workforce opportunity wage act, 2014 PA 138, MCL 408.414.
2018 PA 337, MCL 408.934. For any employee whose hourly wage varies
depending on the work performed, the "normal hourly wage" means the
average hourly wage of the employee in the pay period immediately
prior to the pay period in which the employee used paid earned sick
time.
(8) (7) An employer shall not require an employee to search
for or secure a replacement worker as a condition for using earned
sick time.
(9) For purposes of subsections (2) to (5), "year" means a
regular and consecutive 12-month period, as determined by an
employer.
(10) For purposes of earned sick time accrual under this act,
all of the following apply:
(a) An employee who is exempt from overtime requirements under
section 13(a)(1) of the fair labor standards act, 29 USC 213, is
assumed to work 40 hours in each workweek unless the employee's
normal workweek is less than 40 hours, in which case earned sick
time accrues based on that normal workweek.
(b) An employee who is covered under 29 CFR 825.801 is assumed
to have worked not less than 40 hours in each workweek or is
assumed to have worked not less 30 hours if employed by a small
business.
Sec. 3a. (1) An employer that is a member of a multiemployer
collective bargaining agreement shall not require a qualifying
employee to wait until the ninetieth calendar day after commencing
employment with that employer before using accrued earned sick time
GSS S01066'25 (S-1) p1foi7


if the qualifying employee is also employed by another member of
the multiemployer collective bargaining agreement.
(2) Benefits accrued by a qualifying employee may be
transferred between employers that contribute to the same
multiemployer paid sick leave plan created in accordance with the
Taft-Hartley act of 1947, 29 USC 141 to 191 or similar
multiemployer fringe benefit fund plan created in accordance with
the Taft-Hartley act of 1947, 29 USC 141 to 191 for that qualifying
employee.
(3) As used in this section, "qualifying employee" means an
employee who meets both of the following conditions:
(a) Is employed by an employer that is a member of a
multiemployer collective bargaining agreement and contributes to a
multiemployer fringe benefit fund or similar fund as described in
subsection (2).
(b) Has accrued leave time in accordance with this act.
Sec. 4. (1) An employer shall permit allow an employee to use
the earned sick time accrued or provided under section 3 for any of
the following:
(a) The employee's mental or physical illness, injury, or
health condition; medical diagnosis, care, or treatment of the
employee's mental or physical illness, injury, or health condition;
or preventative medical care for the employee.
(b) For the employee's family member's mental or physical
illness, injury, or health condition, ; medical diagnosis, care, or
treatment of the employee's family member's mental or physical
illness, injury, or health condition ; or preventative medical care
for a family member of the employee.
(c) If the employee or the employee's family member is a
GSS S01066'25 (S-1) p1foi7


victim of domestic violence or sexual assault, for medical care or
psychological or other counseling for physical or psychological
injury or disability, ; to obtain services from a victim services
organization, ; to relocate due to domestic violence or sexual
assault, ; to obtain legal services, ; or to participate in any
civil or criminal proceedings related to or resulting from the
domestic violence or sexual assault.
(d) For meetings at a child's school or place of care related
to the child's health or disability, or the effects of domestic
violence or sexual assault on the child. ; or
(e) For closure of the employee's place of business by order
of a public official due to a public health emergency, ; for an
employee's need to care for a child whose school or place of care
has been closed by order of a public official due to a public
health emergency, ; or when it has been determined by the health
authorities having jurisdiction or by a health care provider that
the employee's or employee's family member's presence in the
community would jeopardize the health of others because of the
employee's or family member's exposure to a communicable disease,
whether or not the employee or family member has actually
contracted the communicable disease.
(2) If the employee's need to use earned sick time is
foreseeable, an employer may require advance notice, not to exceed
7 days prior to before the date the earned sick time is to begin,
of the intention to use the earned sick time. If the employee's
need for the earned sick time is not foreseeable, an employer,
other than an employer that has mandated staffing ratios, may
require the employee to give notice of the intention as soon as
practicable, if specified in a written policy of the employer. An
GSS S01066'25 (S-1) p1foi7


employer that has mandated staffing ratios may require an employee
to comply with the employer's leave policy if the employee's need
for the earned sick time is not foreseeable.
(3) Earned sick time may must be used in the smaller of hourly
1-hour increments or the smallest increment that the employer's
payroll system uses to account for absences of use of other time.
(4) For earned sick time of more than 3 consecutive days, an
employer may require reasonable documentation that the earned sick
time has been used for a purpose described in subsection (1). Upon
the employer's request, the employee must provide the documentation
to the employer in a timely manner. The employer shall not delay
the commencement of earned sick time on the basis that the employer
has not yet received documentation. Documentation signed by a
health care professional indicating that earned sick time is
necessary is reasonable documentation for purposes of this
subsection. In cases of domestic violence or sexual assault, one
any of the following types of documentation selected by the
employee shall be are considered reasonable documentation:
(a) a A police report indicating that the employee or the
employee's family member was a victim of domestic violence or
sexual assault. ;
(b) a A signed statement from a victim and witness advocate
affirming that the employee or employee's family member is
receiving services from a victim services organization. ; or
(c) a A court document indicating that the employee or
employee's family member is involved in legal action related to
domestic violence or sexual assault.
(5) An employer shall not require that the documentation
explain the nature of the illness or the details of the violence.
GSS S01066'25 (S-1) p1foi7


If an employer chooses to require documentation for earned sick
time, the employer is responsible for paying all out-of-pocket
expenses the employee incurs in obtaining the documentation. If the
employee does have health insurance, the employer is responsible
for paying any costs charged to the employee by the health care
provider for providing the specific documentation required by the
employer.
(6) (5) An employer shall not require disclosure of details
relating to domestic violence or sexual assault or the details of
an employee's or an employee's family member's medical condition as
a condition of providing earned sick time under this act. If an
employer possesses health information or information pertaining to
domestic violence or sexual assault about an employee or employee's
family member, the employer shall treat that information as
confidential and shall not disclose that information except to the
affected employee or with the permission of the affected employee.
(7) (6) This act does not require an employer to provide
earned sick time for any purposes other than as described in this
section.
Sec. 6. (1) An employer or any other person shall not
interfere with, restrain, or deny the exercise of, or the attempt
to exercise, any right protected under this act.
(2) An employer shall not take retaliatory personnel action or
discriminate against an employee because the employee has exercised
a right protected under this act. Rights protected by this act
include, but are not limited to, the right to use earned sick time
pursuant to under this act, the right to file a complaint or inform
any person about any employer's alleged violation of this act, the
right to cooperate with the department in its the department's
GSS S01066'25 (S-1) p1foi7


investigations of alleged violations of this act, and the right to
inform any person of his or her the person's rights under this act.
(3) An employer's absence control policy shall must not treat
earned sick time taken under this act as an absence that may lead
to or result in retaliatory personnel action.
(4) The protections in this section apply to any person who
that mistakenly but in good faith alleges a violation of this
section.
(5) There is a rebuttable presumption of a violation of this
section if an employer takes adverse personnel action against a
person within 90 days after that person does any of the following:
(a) Files a complaint with the department or a court alleging
a violation of this act.
(b) Informs any person about an employer's alleged violation
of this act.
(c) Cooperates with the department or another person in the
investigation or prosecution of any alleged violation of this act.
(d) Opposes any policy, practice, or act that is prohibited
under this act.
(e) Informs any person of his or her rights under this act.
Sec. 7. (1) If an employer violates this act, the employee
affected by the violation, at any time within 3 years 1 year after
the violation or the date when the employee knew of the violation,
whichever is later, may do any of the following:
(a) Bring a civil action for appropriate relief, including,
but not limited to, payment for used earned sick time; rehiring or
reinstatement to the employee's previous job; payment of back
wages; reestablishment of employee benefits to which the employee
otherwise would have been eligible if the employee had not been
GSS S01066'25 (S-1) p1foi7


subjected to retaliatory personnel action or discrimination; and an
equal additional amount as liquidated damages together with costs
and reasonable attorney fees as the court allows.
(b) File file a claim with the department. , which The
department shall investigate the claim. Filing a claim with the
department is neither a prerequisite nor a bar to bringing a civil
action.
(2) (a) The director shall enforce the provisions of this act.
In effectuating such enforcement, enforcing this act, the director
shall establish do both of the following:
(a) Establish a system utilizing that uses multiple means of
communication to receive complaints regarding non-compliance that
are related to noncompliance with this act. and investigate
(b) Investigate complaints received by the department in a
timely manner.
(3) (b) Any person alleging that alleges a violation of this
chapter shall have act has the right to file a complaint with the
department. The department shall encourage reporting pursuant to
under this subsection by keeping confidential, to the maximum
extent permitted by applicable laws, the name and other identifying
information of the employee or person reporting the violation. ,
provided, however, that with the authorization of such person,
However, if the person provides authorization to the department,
the department may disclose his or her the person's name and
identifying information as necessary to enforce this chapter act or
for other appropriate purposes.
(4) (c) Upon receiving a complaint alleging a violation of
this chapter, act, the department shall investigate such the
complaint and attempt to resolve it through mediation between the
GSS S01066'25 (S-1) p1foi7


complainant and the subject of the complaint, or other means. The
department shall keep complainants a complainant notified regarding
the status of their the complainant's complaint and any resultant
investigation. If the department believes that a violation has
occurred, it shall issue to the offending person or entity a notice
of violation and the relief required of the offending person or
entity. The department shall prescribe the form and wording of such
notices of violation including any method of appealing the decision
of the department.
(5) (d) The department shall have the power to may impose
penalties and to grant an employee or former employee all
appropriate relief, including but not limited to, payment of all
earned sick time improperly withheld, any and all damages incurred
by the complaint as the result of violation of this act, back pay,
and reinstatement in the case of job loss.
(6) (3) If the director determines that there is reasonable
cause to believe that an employer violated this act and the
department is subsequently unable to obtain voluntary compliance by
the employer within a reasonable time, the department shall bring a
civil action as provided in subsection (1)(a) on behalf of the
employee. The department may investigate and file a civil action
under subsection (1)(a) on behalf of all employees of that employer
who are similarly situated at the same work site worksite. and who
have not brought a civil action under subsection (1)(a). A contract
or agreement between the employer and the employee or any
acceptance by the employee of a paid or unpaid leave policy that
provides fewer rights or benefits than provided by this act is void
and unenforceable.
(7) (4) In addition to liability for civil remedies described
GSS S01066'25 (S-1) p1foi7


in this section, an employer who fails to provide earned sick time
in violation of this act or that takes retaliatory personnel action
against an employee or former employee is subject to a civil fine
of not more than $1,000.00 for each violation.
(8) In addition to liability for civil remedies described in
this section, an employer that fails to provide earned sick time to
an employee in violation of this act is subject to a civil fine of
not more than 8 times the employee's normal hourly wage.
(9) (5) An employer that willfully violates a notice or
posting requirement of section 8 is subject to a civil fine of not
more than $100.00 for each separate violation.
Final Page
GSS S01066'25 (S-1) p1foi7